Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1007.
do enact as follows:AB1007,13Section 1. 175.51 (1v) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1007,2,34175.51 (1v) (a) In this subsection, “veteran at risk” means a veteran or an 5active-duty member of the armed forces, the national guard, or the military reserve 1forces of the United States who is known, based on the information provided by the 2person making the report, to have a physical or mental health condition that is 3related to his or her service.AB1007,2,44